Washington statutes.
RCW 33.48.150

Organizing permit—Required.

No subscriptions or funds from proposed stockholders of any proposed association, prior to its incorporation and prior to a decision by the director on its application for approval of its articles of incorporation, may be solicited or taken until a verified application for an organizing permit has been filed and a permit has been issued by the director authorizing such subscription or collection of funds and then, only in accordance with the terms of such permit.

[ 1994 c 92 s 481; 1973 c 130 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.

Definitions—1973 c 130: See RCW 33.24.350.